Utah statutes.
31A-35-202.   Board responsibilities.
The board shall:
(1)  meet:
(a)  at least quarterly; and
(b)  at the call of the chair;
(2)  make written recommendations to the commissioner for rules governing the
following aspects of the bail bond surety insurance business:
(a) qualifications, applications, and fees for obtaining:
(i)  a license required by this Section 31A-35-401; or
(ii)  a certificate;
(b) limits on the aggregate amounts of bail bonds;
(c)  unprofessional conduct;
(d)  procedures for hearing and resolving allegations of unprofessional
conduct; and
(e)  sanctions for unprofessional conduct;
(3)  screen:
(a)  bail bond surety company license applications; and
(b)  persons applying for a bail bond surety company license;
(4)  recommend to the commissioner action regarding the granting, renewing,
suspending, revoking, and reinstating of bail bond surety company license; and
(5) (a)  conduct investigations of allegations of unprofessional conduct on
the part of persons or bail bond sureties involved in the business of bail
bond surety insurance; and
(b)  provide the results of the investigations described in Subsection (5)(a)
to the commissioner with recommendations for:
(i)  action; and
(ii)  any appropriate sanctions.
